Utah statutes.
78A-10-303.   Procedure.

(1)  Four commissioners are a quorum.

(2)  The governor shall appoint a member of the governor's staff to serve as staff to each Trial Court Nominating Commission.

(3)  The governor shall:

(a)  ensure that each Trial Court Nominating Commission follows the rules promulgated by the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice; and

(b)  resolve any questions regarding those rules.

(4)  A member of a Trial Court Nominating Commission who is also a member of the Utah State Bar may recuse himself if there is a conflict of interest that makes the member unable to serve.



Amended by Chapter 134, 2010 General Session

